test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-s4_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - doya: # 
    doya+V+Inf: doya
    doya+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: doyddi
    doya+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: doyddu
    doya+V+Sup: doytt
    doya+V+PrfPrc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: doyddur
